Hawaii statutes.
§710-1028 Hindering prosecution; definition
of rendering assistance. For the purposes of sections [710-1029 and
710-1030], a person renders assistance to another if he:

(1) Harbors or conceals such person;

(2) Warns such person of impending discovery,
apprehension, prosecution, or conviction, except this does not apply to a
warning given in connection with an effort to bring another into compliance
with the law;

(3) Provides such person with money, transportation,
weapon, disguise, or other means of avoiding discovery, apprehension,
prosecution, or conviction;

(4) Prevents or obstructs, by means of force,
deception, or intimidation, anyone from performing an act that might aid in the
discovery, apprehension, prosecution, or conviction of such person; or

(5) Suppresses by an act of concealment, alteration,
or destruction any physical evidence that might aid in the discovery,
apprehension, prosecution, or conviction of such person. [L 1972, c 9, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next